New York, session 2025-2026, A1782.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 6705-b 2 to read as follows: 3 § 6705-b. Veterinarian telehealth. 1. A veterinarian may provide care 4 via telehealth services if they comply with all of the following condi- 5 tions: 6 (a) Ensure that the client knows the identity and contact information 7 of the veterinarian providing the telehealth service. Upon request, the 8 veterinarian shall provide their licensure information including the 9 name of the state where they are licensed and the license number. 10 (b) Ensure that the technology method and equipment used to provide 11 telehealth services complies with all current privacy-protection laws. 12 (c) Employ sound professional judgment to determine whether using 13 telehealth is an appropriate method for delivering medical advice or 14 treatment to the animal patient. 15 (d) Have sufficient knowledge of the animal patient to render tele- 16 health services demonstrated by satisfying at least one of the follow- 17 ing: (i) have recently examined the animal patient in person or have 18 obtained current knowledge of the animal patient through the use of 19 instrumentation and diagnostic equipment through which images and 20 medical records may be transmitted electronically; or (ii) have 21 conducted medically appropriate and timely visits to the premises where 22 the group of animal patients is kept. 23 (e) Act within the scope of their practice. 24 (f) Exercise the same standard of care applicable to a traditional, 25 in-person veterinary care service. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04726-01-5 A. 1782 2 1 (g) Be readily available to the animal patient for follow up veteri- 2 nary services or ensure there is another suitable provider available for 3 follow up care. 4 2. Consent for medical advice and treatment under this section shall 5 be obtained before providing a telehealth service. Evidence of consent 6 for medical advice and treatment must be maintained in the animal 7 patient's medical record. 8 3. A veterinarian providing a telehealth service may prescribe a drug 9 if the veterinarian is a prescriber acting within the scope of their 10 practice and in compliance with this article. 11 4. For purposes of this section, "telehealth" shall mean the use of 12 electronic information and communication technologies by a veterinarian 13 to deliver animal health care services, which shall include the assess- 14 ment, diagnosis, consultation, treatment, and care management of an 15 animal patient. Telehealth shall not include delivery of health care 16 services by means of facsimile machines, or electronic messaging alone, 17 though use of these technologies is not precluded if used in conjunction 18 with telemedicine, store and forward technology, or remote patient moni- 19 toring. 20 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.